Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SEEDS WORTH SOWING.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Seeds Worth Sowing to celebrate and sustain the traditions, histories, and community practices of African American and African immigrant families in Minnesota; strengthen community ties; amplify African heritage narratives; and provide accessible cultural programming that fosters collective resilience and belonging for future generations. This appropriation may be used for intergenerational learning programs, youth engagement, cultural preservation efforts, educational workshops, storytelling projects, and community-based events that uplift Black ancestral knowledge, land-based traditions, and mutual aid practices. new text end